Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-512
Transfer of
raw fur by carriers; document required; penalty.

Every express company and common carrier, their officers,
agents, and servants, and every other person who (1) transfers or carries
from one point to another within the state, (2) takes out of the state, or
(3) receives, for the purpose of transferring from this state, any raw furs
protected by the Game Law, except as permitted in this section, shall be guilty
of a Class III misdemeanor. Any express
company, railroad, common carrier, or postmaster may receive
raw furs protected by the Game Law for transportation from one point to another
by express, baggage, or mail when such raw
fur is accompanied by a document placed
upon the package giving the name of the consignee, the number of his or her
fur-harvesting permit, the
date of expiration of the permit which must be on or after the date of shipment, and
a description of the kind and number of each kind of raw fur in the shipment.

Laws 1929, c. 112, V, § 8, p. 428;

C.S.1929, § 37-508;

Laws 1933, c. 67, § 2, p. 306;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 37-508;

R.S.1943, § 37-508;

Laws 1945, c. 78, § 6, p. 291;

Laws 1981, LB 72, § 18;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 31;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-508;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 232;

Laws 2011, LB41, § 27.